Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.100

Criterion for registering.

(1) The director shall require the information required under RCW 15.58.060 and shall register the label or labeling for such pesticide if he or she determines that:

(a) Its composition is such as to warrant the proposed claims for it;

(b) Its labeling and other material required to be submitted comply with the requirements of this chapter;

(c) It will perform its intended function without unreasonable adverse effects on the environment;

(d) When used in accordance with widespread and commonly recognized practice it will not generally cause unreasonable adverse effects on the environment;

(e) In the case of any pesticide subject to section 24(c) of FIFRA, it meets (a), (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection and the following criteria:

(i) The proposed classification for general use, for restricted use, or for both is in conformity with section 3(d) of FIFRA;

(ii) A special local need exists.

(2) The director shall not make any lack of essentiality a criterion for denying registration of any pesticide.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6066; 1979 c 146 s 2; 1971 ex.s. c 190 s 10.]